Washington statutes.
RCW 11.28.010

Letters to executors—Refusal to serve—Disqualification.

After the entry of an order admitting a will to probate and appointing a personal representative, or personal representatives, letters testamentary shall be granted to the persons therein appointed executors. If a part of the persons thus appointed refuse to act, or be disqualified, the letters shall be granted to the other persons appointed therein. If all such persons refuse to act, letters of administration with the will annexed shall be granted to the person to whom administration would have been granted if there had been no will.

[ 1974 ex.s. c 117 s 28; 1965 c 145 s 11.28.010. Prior: 1917 c 156 s 47; RRS s 1417; prior: Code 1881 s 1372; 1863 p 217 s 106; 1860 p 179 s 73.]

NOTES:

Application, construction—Severability—Effective date—1974 ex.s. c 117: See RCW 11.02.080 and notes following.